Maryland, session 2025, SB0950.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Utilities
7–218.
(A) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW, AND SUBJECT TO
SUBSECTIONS (B) AND (C) OF THIS SECTION, NATURAL GAS GENERATING FACILITIES
MAY BE CONSTRUCTED, PERMITTED, AND OPERATED IN THE STATE UNTIL THE
STATE MEETS 50% OF ITS ENERGY NEEDS FROM RENEWABLE ENERGY RESOURCES,
INCLUDING NUCLEAR ENERGY.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0950*

SENATE BILL 950
(B) A PERSON CONSTRUCTING A NATURAL GAS GENERATING FACILITY
UNDER THIS SECTION MUST OBTAIN:
(1) A CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC CONVENIENCE AND NECESSITY UNDER
§ 7–207 OF THIS SUBTITLE; OR
(2) COMMISSION APPROVAL UNDER § 7–207.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(C) ONCE THE STATE MEETS 50% OF ITS ENERGY NEEDS FROM RENEWABLE
ENERGY RESOURCES, INCLUDING NUCLEAR ENERGY, THE MARYLAND ENERGY
ADMINISTRATION SHALL WORK WITH THE OWNERS AND OPERATORS OF NATURAL
GAS GENERATING FACILITIES IN THE STATE TO DECREASE THE PRODUCTION OF
ENERGY FROM NATURAL GAS GENERATING FACILITIES AT THE SAME RATE AS
ENERGY PRODUCED FROM RENEWABLE ENERGY RESOURCES, INCLUDING NUCLEAR
ENERGY, IS INCREASED.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.